Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-502] Power of regents to grant
tuition waivers. The board of regents, or its designated representatives,
is authorized to grant, modify, or suspend tuition waivers.

The board may:

(1) Waive entirely or reduce the tuition fee or any
of the other fees for graduate teaching and research assistants;

(2) Enter into agreements with government and
university officials of any other state or foreign country to provide for
reciprocal waiver of the nonresident tuition and fee differential;

(3) Waive the nonresident tuition and fee
differential for selected students from Pacific and Asian jurisdictions when
their presence would be beneficial to the university or the State;

(4) Waive entirely or reduce the tuition fee or any
of the other fees for students, resident or nonresident; and

(5) Waive the nonresident tuition and fee
differential for members in good standing of the following military units,
regardless of their actual state of residence:

(A) The Hawaii national guard; and

(B) The federal reserve components of the
Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, and Coast Guard who attend drills with
units located within the State.

The board shall determine the percentage of
allowable tuition and fee waivers for financial need and other university
priorities. These tuition waivers and waivers of the nonresident tuition and
fee differential shall be awarded in accordance with guidelines established by
the board. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2 and c 188, pt of §1]

Revision Note

The amendment by L 2006, c 188, pt of §1 to repealed §304-4
is included in this section pursuant to L 2006, c 75, §18.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next